Vermont, session 2025-2026, S182.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 353 is amended to read:
§ 353. DEGREE OF OFFENSE; SENTENCING UPON CONVICTION
(a) Penalties.
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (3), (4), or (5) of this subsection,
cruelty to animals under section 352 of this title shall be punishable by a
sentence of imprisonment of not more than one year or a fine of not more than
$2,000.00, or both. Second and subsequent convictions shall be punishable by
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 2 of 15
a sentence of imprisonment of not more than two years or a fine of not more
than $5,000.00, or both.
(2) Aggravated cruelty under section 352a of this title shall be
punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than five years or a fine
of not more than $5,000.00, or both. Second and subsequent offenses shall be
punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than ten 10 years or a
fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both.
(3) An offense committed under subdivision 352(5) or (6) of this title
shall be punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than five years
or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(4)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (4), a
person found in violation of subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title pursuant
to this subdivision shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not
more than $2,000.00, or both. Second and subsequent convictions shall be
punishable by a sentence of imprisonment of not more than two years or a fine
of not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(B) In lieu of a criminal citation or arrest, a law enforcement officer
may issue a civil citation to a person who violates subdivision 352(3), (4), or
(9) of this title if the person has not been previously adjudicated in violation of
this chapter. A person adjudicated in violation of subdivision 352(3), (4), or
(9) of this title pursuant to this subdivision shall be assessed a civil penalty of
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 3 of 15
not more than $500.00. At any time prior to the person admitting the violation
and paying the assessed penalty, the State’s Attorney may withdraw the
complaint filed with the Judicial Bureau and file an information charging a
violation of subdivision 352(3), (4), or (9) of this title in the Criminal Division
of the Superior Court.
(C) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require that a
civil citation be issued prior to a criminal charge of violating subdivision
352(3), (4), or (9) of this title.
(5) A person who violates subdivision 352(1) of this title by
intentionally killing or attempting to kill an animal belonging to another or
subdivision 352(2) of this title by torturing, administering poison to, or cruelly
harming or mutilating an animal shall be imprisoned not more than two years
or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
* * *
(c) Upon an order of forfeiture of an animal under this section or section
354 of this title, the court shall order custody of the animal remanded to a
humane society or other individual deemed appropriate by the court, for further
disposition in accordance with accepted practices for humane treatment of
animals. A transfer of rights under this section constitutes a transfer of
ownership and shall not constitute or authorize any limitation upon the right of
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 4 of 15
the humane society, individual, or other entity, to whom rights are granted to
dispose of the animal.
(d) A person convicted of violating a provision of this chapter shall be
assessed a surcharge of $50.00, which shall be added to any fine or surcharge
imposed by the court pursuant to section 7282 of this title. The court shall
collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to be credited
to the Animal Welfare Fund established pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 3203. The
collection procedures described in section 5240 of this title shall be utilized in
the collection of this surcharge.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 354 is amended to read:
§ 354. ENFORCEMENT; POSSESSION OF ABUSED ANIMAL;
SEARCHES AND SEIZURES; FORFEITURE
(a) The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall be consulted prior
to any enforcement action brought pursuant to this chapter that involves
livestock and poultry. Law enforcement may consult with the Secretary in
person or by electronic means, and the Secretary shall assist law enforcement
in determining whether the practice or animal condition, or both, represent
acceptable livestock or poultry husbandry practices.
(b) Any humane officer as defined in section 351 of this title may enforce
this chapter. As part of an enforcement action, a humane officer may seize an
animal being cruelly treated in violation of this chapter.
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 5 of 15
(1) Voluntary surrender. A humane officer may accept animals
voluntarily surrendered by the owner anytime during the cruelty investigation.
The humane officer shall have a surrendered animal examined and assessed
within 72 hours by a veterinarian licensed to practice in the State of Vermont.
(2) Search and seizure using a search warrant. A humane officer having
probable cause to believe an animal is being subjected to cruel treatment in
violation of this subchapter may apply for a search warrant pursuant to the
Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure to authorize the officer to enter the
premises where the animal is kept and seize the animal. The application and
affidavit for the search warrant shall be reviewed and authorized by an attorney
for the State when sought by an officer other than an enforcement officer
defined in 23 V.S.A. § 4(11). A veterinarian licensed to practice in Vermont
must accompany the humane officer during the execution of the search
warrant.
(3) Seizure without a search warrant. If the humane officer witnesses a
situation in which the humane officer determines that an animal’s life is in
jeopardy and immediate action is required to protect the animal’s health or
safety, the officer may seize the animal without a warrant. The humane officer
shall immediately take an animal seized under this subdivision to a licensed
veterinarian for medical attention to stabilize the animal’s condition and to
assess the health of the animal.
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 6 of 15
(c) A humane officer shall provide suitable care at a reasonable cost for an
animal seized under this section, and have a lien on the animal for all expenses
incurred. A humane officer may arrange for the euthanasia of a severely
injured, diseased, or suffering animal upon the recommendation of a licensed
veterinarian. A humane officer may arrange for euthanasia of an animal seized
under this section when the owner is unwilling or unable to provide necessary
medical attention required while the animal is in custodial care or when the
animal cannot be safely confined under standard housing conditions. An
animal not destroyed by euthanasia shall be kept in custodial care and provided
with necessary medical care until final disposition of the criminal charges
except as provided in subsections (d) through (h) of this section. The custodial
caregiver shall be responsible for maintaining the records applicable to all
animals seized, including identification, residence, location, medical treatment,
and disposition of the animals.
(d) If an animal is seized under this section, the State may institute a civil
proceeding for forfeiture of the animal in the territorial unit of the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court where the offense is alleged to have occurred.
The proceeding shall be instituted by a motion for forfeiture if a criminal
charge has been filed or a petition for forfeiture if no criminal charge has been
filed, which shall be filed with the court and served upon the animal’s owner.
The civil forfeiture proceeding is intended to run independently from any
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 7 of 15
criminal prosecution and shall not be delayed pending disposition of any
criminal proceeding.
(e)(1) A preliminary hearing shall be held within 21 days of institution of
the civil forfeiture proceeding. If the defendant requests a hearing on the
merits, the court shall schedule a final hearing on the merits to be held within
21 days of the date of the preliminary hearing. Time limits under this
subsection shall not be construed as jurisdictional.
(2) If the defendant fails to respond to the notice for preliminary hearing,
the court shall enter a default judgment ordering the immediate forfeiture of
the animal in accordance with the provisions of subsection 353(c) of this title.
A motion to reopen a default judgment shall be filed in writing with the court
no later than 30 days after entry of a default judgment. A default judgment
shall not be reopened unless good cause is shown.
(f)(1) At the hearing on the motion for forfeiture, the State shall have the
burden of establishing by clear and convincing evidence that the animal was
subjected to cruelty, neglect, or abandonment in violation of section 352 or
352a of this title. The court shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law
and shall issue a final order. If the State meets its burden of proof, the court
shall order the immediate forfeiture of the animal in accordance with the
provisions of subsection 353(c) of this title.
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 8 of 15
(1) Unless a person claiming a legal interest in the animal requests a
hearing pursuant to subdivision (4)(A) of this subsection, title to an animal
seized pursuant to section 353 of this title shall be forfeited pursuant to
subsection 353(c) of this title 20 days after seizure if the procedures of this
subsection are followed. The computation of the 20-day period shall include
the day on which the animal is seized.
(2) A person claiming a legal interest in the seized animal at the time of
the seizure who requests a hearing pursuant to subdivision (4)(A) of this
subsection shall post security in an amount typically needed to cover food for
that species of animal for an initial 40-day period. The amount of the security
shall be set pursuant to an administrative schedule published by the Director of
Animal Welfare. The security shall be posted within 10 days following the
seizure, and the computation of the 10-day period shall include the day on
which the animal is seized. The court shall collect and transfer the security to
the Animal Welfare Fund established pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 3203.
(3) The humane officer who seizes an animal pursuant to this section
shall give notice of this section at the time of the seizure by delivering a copy
of it to a person who is present and claims a legal interest in the animal or by
posting a copy of it at the place where the animal was seized. Any person who
is known to claim a legal interest in the animal who is not present shall be
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 9 of 15
provided with the notice by personal delivery or by certified mail as soon as
reasonably possible after the person is identified. The notice shall include:
(A) a description of the animal seized; the authority and purpose for
the seizure; the time, place, and circumstances under which the animal was
seized; and the contact information for the authority with legal custody of the
animal;
(B) a statement that any person claiming a legal interest in the animal
at the time of seizure may post security and request a hearing concerning the
seizure and that failure to do so within 10 days following the date of the notice
will result in forfeiture of title and disposition of the animal;
(C) a statement of the amount due as security and how to pay it; and
(D) instructions for accessing the form that may be used to request a
hearing under this subsection (d).
(4)(A) The court shall hold a due process hearing if a request is made
within 10 days after the seizure by a person claiming a legal interest in the
animal at the time of the seizure. The hearing shall be held within 30 days
after the request in the territorial unit of the Criminal Division of the Superior
Court where the offense is alleged to have occurred.
(B) The State shall have the burden of establishing by clear and
convincing evidence that the animal was subjected to cruelty, neglect, or
abandonment in violation of section 352 or 352a of this title. The court shall
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 10 of 15
make findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall issue a final order
within five business days after the hearing. The findings shall include the total
amount of all costs incurred by the custodial caregiver. If the State meets its
burden of proof, the court shall order the immediate forfeiture of the animal in
accordance with the provisions of subsection 353(c) of this title.
(C) Notwithstanding subdivision (B) of this subdivision (d)(4) the
court may order the animal returned to the petitioner if the court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that the petitioner:
(i) is not the defendant in a cruelty case involving the animal;
(ii) did not participate in or expressly or implicitly consent to the
alleged cruel treatment of the animal;
(iii) did not have any express or implied knowledge that the
defendant was likely to treat the animal cruelly; and
(iv) will provide adequate care to the animal if it is returned,
including any immediately necessary veterinary care or follow-up care needed
in connection with the reason for seizure.
(2)(D) Affidavits of law enforcement officers, humane officers,
animal control officers, veterinarians, or expert witnesses of either party shall
be admissible evidence that may be rebutted by witnesses called by either
party. The affidavits shall be delivered to the other party at least five business
days prior to the hearing. Upon request of the other party or the court, the
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 11 of 15
party offering an affidavit shall make the affiant available by telephone at the
hearing. The court may allow any witness to testify by telephone in lieu of a
personal appearance and shall adopt rules with respect to such testimony.
(3)(E) No testimony or other information presented by the defendant
in connection with a forfeiture proceeding under this section or any
information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other
information may be used for any purpose, including impeachment and cross-
examination, against the defendant in any criminal case, except a prosecution
for perjury or giving a false statement.
(e) If an order of forfeiture is not entered after the hearing, the animal shall
be returned to the person claiming an interest in the animal upon payment to
the custodial caretaker of all actual costs of care and keeping during the period
of impound, including veterinary care, provided that the payment of costs shall
not be required if the court finds that there was no reasonable basis for the
seizure. If payment of the costs required by this subsection is not made within
15 days after the final order, the custodial caretaker’s costs shall be reimbursed
from the Animal Welfare Fund established pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 3203.
(g)(1)(f) If the defendant is convicted of criminal charges under this chapter
or if an order of forfeiture is entered against an owner under this section, the
security posted pursuant to this section shall be applied to the actual costs
incurred by the custodial caretaker in caring and keeping the animal through
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 12 of 15
the date of forfeiture, including food, boarding, and the cost of any veterinary
services. Any excess shall be returned to the person who posted the security.
The defendant or owner shall be required to repay all reasonable costs incurred
by the custodial caregiver for caring for the animal, including veterinary
expenses. The Restitution Unit within the Center for Crime Victim Services is
authorized to collect the funds owed by the defendant or owner on behalf of
the custodial caregiver or a governmental agency that has contracted or paid
for custodial care in the same manner as restitution is collected pursuant to
section 7043 of this title. The restitution order shall include the information
required under subdivision 7043(e)(2)(A) of this title. The court shall make
findings with respect to the total amount of all costs incurred by the custodial
caregiver.
(2)(A) If the defendant is acquitted of criminal charges under this chapter
and a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section is not pending, an animal
that has been taken into custodial care shall be returned to the defendant unless
the State institutes a civil forfeiture proceeding under this section within seven
business days of the acquittal.
(B) If the court rules in favor of the owner in a civil forfeiture
proceeding under this section and criminal charges against the owner under
this chapter are not pending, an animal that has been taken into custodial care
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 13 of 15
shall be returned to the owner unless the State files criminal charges under this
section within seven business days after the entry of final judgment.
(C) If an animal is returned to a defendant or owner under this
subdivision, the defendant or owner shall not be responsible for the costs of
caring for the animal.
(h)(g)(1) A forfeiture order issued under this section may be appealed as a
matter of right to the Supreme Court within 10 days after the appellant posts
security pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection. The order shall not be
stayed pending appeal.
(2) The appellant shall post security in an amount typically needed to
cover costs and keeping for that species of animal from the time of impound
through the date of filing and an amount equal to the estimated cost of care and
keeping of the animal for a subsequent 30-day period, with an additional 30-
day cost and keeping allotment due every 30 days thereafter until the owner
relinquishes the animal or until final disposition of the case. The amount of the
security shall be set pursuant to an administrative schedule published by the
Director of Animal Welfare. The court shall collect and transfer the security to
the Animal Welfare Fund established pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 3203.
(3) An appeal brought pursuant to this section shall be heard on an
expedited timeline, and the final decision shall be issued within five business
days after the hearing, if any.
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 14 of 15
(4) Upon payment of the security required by this subsection, the
custodial caretaker may immediately begin to draw from those funds for
reimbursement of the actual costs incurred in caring for the animal from the
date of impoundment. Upon final disposition of the case, funds remaining
after payment of actual costs shall be refunded to the owner.
(i)(h) The provisions of this section are in addition to and not in lieu of the
provisions of section 353 of this title.
(j)(i) It is unlawful for a person to interfere with a humane officer, the
Director of Animal Welfare, or the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
engaged in official duties under this chapter. A person who violates this
subsection shall be prosecuted under section 3001 of this title.
(j)(1) The time limits established in this section are not jurisdictional and
may be extended by the court for good cause shown.
(2) The security required by this section may be reduced or waived by
the court on the basis of financial hardship to the defendant.
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. § 3203 is amended to read:
§ 3203. ANIMAL WELFARE FUND
(a) The Animal Welfare Fund is established within the Department of
Public Safety to fund the expenses incurred by the Division of Animal Welfare
in implementing the requirements of this chapter and to provide reimbursement
VT LEG #385916 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.182
2026 Page 15 of 15
for the costs of caring for animals seized pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 8. The
Director of Animal Welfare shall administer the Fund.
(b) The Fund shall consist of:
(1) 67 percent of the revenue collected from the surcharge assessed
under subsection 3581(f) of this title;
(2) fees imposed by the court clerk and designated for deposit into the
Fund pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 353(d);
(3) restitution as ordered by the court pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 354;
(4) security posted by defendants pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 354; and
(2)(5) appropriations made by the General Assembly.
(c) All balances in the Fund at the end of the fiscal year shall be carried
forward. Interest earned by the Fund shall remain in the Fund.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385916 v.1